Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1170.03
Request; allowance in part; issuance of warrant.

When a request has been in part allowed by the Department of Administrative Services, a warrant shall be drawn as in other cases in which the whole request is allowed.

Laws 1877, § 5, p. 203;

R.S.1913, § 6684;

C.S.1922, § 6221;

C.S.1929, § 77-2610;

R.S.1943, § 77-2410;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 77-2410;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 16.

State warrant is not negotiable instrument. Bartley v. State, 53 Neb. 310, 73 N.W. 744 (1898).